Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.210

Receiver—Successive appointments.

In the case of removal, death, or resignation of a receiver, the court may appoint a new receiver to take charge of the affairs of the former city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.210. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 13, part; RRS s 8926, part.]